Louisiana, session 2026, SB299.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1483.1(G) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1483.1. Louisiana Fortify Homes Program
* * *
G.(1) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit a nonprofit
organization from providing additional support and resources to a recipient of
a grant to assist in covering the cost of installing a fortified roof including those
costs incurred pursuant to Subsection B of this Section.
(2) No rule or regulation promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to
Subsection A of this Section to govern eligibility requirements for grants and
the administration of the program shall prohibit a nonprofit organization from
providing additional support and resources to a recipient of a grant to assist in
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-554 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 299
covering the cost of installing a fortified roof including those costs incurred
pursuant to Subsection B of this Section.
(3) For the purposes of this Subsection, "nonprofit organization" means
any organization organized on a not-for-profit basis and that is exempt from
federal and state taxation pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code and
applicable provisions of Louisiana law.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.